Utah statutes.
10-3-1012.5.   Appeal to Court of Appeals -- Scope of review.

Any final action or order of the commission may be appealed to the Court of Appeals for review.  The notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days of the issuance of the final action or order of the commission.  The review by Court of Appeals shall be on the record of the commission and shall be for the purpose of determining if the commission has abused its discretion or exceeded its authority.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

